Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.261

Mortgage loan originator—Prelicensing education requirements.

(1) Each mortgage loan originator applicant shall complete at least twenty hours of prelicensing education approved by the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry. The prelicensing education shall include at least three hours of federal law and regulations; three hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues; two hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace; and at least two hours of training specifically related to Washington law.

(2) A mortgage loan originator applicant having successfully completed the prelicensing education requirements approved by the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry for any state shall be accepted as credit towards completion of prelicensing education requirements in this state.

(3) This chapter does not preclude any prelicensing education course, as approved by the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry, that is provided by the employer of the mortgage loan originator applicant or an entity which is affiliated with the applicant by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of such an employer or entity. Prelicensing education may be offered either in a classroom, online, or by any other means approved by the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry.

[ 2009 c 120 s 22.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "and registry" was removed by 2013 c 29 s 1.

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.